Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 5 Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement
Acts 2017, No. 610, § 2: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the law prohibits a publicly supported retirement system from implementing a benefit enhancement if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization; that the law prohibits a publicly supported system from implementing a benefit enhancement if it has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by law; that the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System uses a general life expectancy table; and that the current method of redetermining benefits will cause the retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization if not immediately resolved by increasing the system's assets and reducing its unfunded liabilities. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on and after July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 295, § 3: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System has an amortization that exceeds the standard thirty-year amortization of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability prescribed by law; and that this act is necessary because increasing the assets of the system will facilitate reducing the system's unfunded liability. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.